en: beetroot powder
de: färbendes Lebensmittel Rote Bete Pulver
it: polvere di barbabietola
ro: pudră de sfeclă roșie

en: beetroot syrup
de: Rote-Beete-Sirup
es: sirope de remolacha, jarabe de remolacha
hr: sirup od cikle
it: sciroppo di barbabietola

en: beetroot juice, beet juice
ar: عصير شمندر
az: çuğundur şirəsi
bg: сок от цвекло
cs: šťáva z červené řepy
de: Randensaft
es: jugo de remolacha
fi: punajuurimehu, punajuuritäysmehu
fr: jus de betterave
hr: sok od cikle
hu: céklalé
it: succo di barbabietola
ja: ビートジュース
ml: ബീറ്റ്‌റൂട്ട് ജ്യൂസ്
nb: rødbetsaft
nl: bietensap
pl: sok z buraka, sok buraczany, kwas buraczany
ru: свекольный сок
sv: rödbetsjuice
uk: буряковий сік
zh: 甜菜汁

en: beetroot juice concentrate
da: rødbedejuice fra koncentrat
de: Randensaft aus Konzentrat
es: Jugo de remolacha concentrado.
fi: punajuurimehutiiviste
fr: jus de betterave concentré, jus concentré de betterave
hr: koncentrirani sok od cikle, ugośćeni sok cikle, koncentrirani sok od cikle za bojenje
it: succo concentrato di barbabietola
nl: bietensapconcentraat, rode bietensapconcentraat
pl: koncentrat soku z buraka
sk: koncentrát šťavy z cvikly

fr: concentré de betterave
bg: концентрат от цвекло
cs: koncentrát z červené řepy
de: Rote-Bete-Konzentrat
es: concentrado de remolacha
fi: punajuuritiiviste
it: concentrato di barbabietola
ja: ビーツ濃縮液
lt: raudonųjų burokėlių koncentratas
pl: koncentrat z buraka
pt: concentrado de beterraba
ru: концентрат свеклы
sk: koncentrát z cvikly
sv: rödbetskoncentrat

fr: fibres de betterave
fi: juurikaskuitu
sv: betfiber

en: red beetroot juice
de: Rote Betesaft, Rote Bete Saft, Rote Beete Saft

en: red beetroot juice concentrate
de: Rote Bete-Saftkonzentrat, Rote Betesaft aus Fruchtsaftkonzentrat

en: beetroot sprouts
de: Rote-Bete-Sprossen
es: germen de remolacha
fi: punajuuren idut
fr: pousses de betterave
hr: klice cikle
it: germogli di barbabietola
nl: bietenkiemen
pl: kiełki buraka

en: broccoli raab, broccolii rabe, rapini
de: Wildbrokkoli
es: grelos, rapini
fr: rapini, brocoli-rave
hr: rapini
it: friarielli, broccoletti, broccoli di rapa, cime di rapa, rapini, pulezze

en: broccoli, broccoli cuts
af: Broccoli
ar: قنبيط أخضر
az: Brokkoli
bg: Броколи
bn: ব্রকলি
bo: མེ་ཚལ་ལྗང་ཁུ།
bs: Brokula
ca: bròcoli
cs: brokolice
cy: Brocoli
da: broccoli
de: Brokkoli, Broccoli
dv: ބުރޮކޯޅި
el: Μπρόκολο
eo: Brokolo
es: Brócoli, Brócolis
et: brokkoli, spargelkapsas
eu: Brokoli
fa: کلم بروکلی
fi: parsakaali
fr: Brocoli, Brocolis, choux brocolis
ga: Brocailí
gl: Brócoli
gv: Callish Rangagh
he: ברוקולי
hr: brokula
ht: Bwokoli
hu: Brokkoli
hy: բրոկկոլի
id: Brokoli
is: Spergilkál
it: broccoli
ja: ブロッコリー
jv: Brokoli
kk: Брокколи
kn: ಬ್ರಾಕಲಿ
ko: 브로콜리
la: Brassica oleracea italica
lo: ດອກກ້ວຍໄມ້ຝະລັ່ງ
lt: Brokolis
lv: brokoļi
mk: Брокула
ml: ബ്രോക്കൊളി
mr: ब्रोकली
ms: Brokoli
nb: brokkoli
nl: broccoli
nn: brokkoli
nv: Chʼilzooł
os: Брокколи
pa: ਬਰੋਕਲੀ
pl: brokuł, brokuły, brokuła, brokułów, brokułowy, brokułowa, brokułowe
pt: brócolos
ro: Broccoli
ru: брокколи, Капуста брокколи
sh: Brokula
sk: Brokolica
sl: Brokoli
sr: броколи
su: Brokoli
sv: broccoli
ta: புரோக்கோலி
te: బ్రొక్కొలి
th: บรอกโคลี
tl: Brokoli
tr: Brokoli
uk: броколі
ur: شاخ گوبھی
vi: Bông cải xanh
zh: 西蘭花

en: broccoli floret, broccoli top
da: broccolibuket, broccolibuketter
de: Brokkoliröschen
fr: brocolis en fleurettes, fleurettes de brocolis
hr: cvjetić brokule
it: fiore di broccolo
nl: broccoliroosjes, broccoli roosjes
sv: broccolibukett, broccolibuketter

en: broccoli cress
da: broccolikarse
de: Brokkolikresse
es: mastuerzo
fr: pousses de brocoli
hr: brokula kres
it: crescione di broccoli
nl: broccoli cress
sv: broccolikrasse

en: romanesco broccoli, Broccolo Romanesco, Romanesque cauliflower, Romanesco
xx: romanesco
ar: بروكلى رومانسكى
de: Romanesco
eo: florbrokolo
es: romanescu
et: romaani lillkapsas
eu: romanesko
fa: کلم رومی
fr: choux romanesco, chou romanesco, romanesco, choux romanesco en fleurettes, fleurettes de chou romanesco
gl: brócoli romanesco
hr: romanesco brokula
hu: pagodakarfiol
id: romanesko
it: broccolo romanesco
ja: ロマネスコ
kk: романеско қырыққабаты, romanesko qırıqqabatı, رومانەسكو قىرىققاباتى
la: brassica oleracea convar. botrytis var. botrytis
mk: римска брокула
ml: റൊമാനെസ്കോ ബ്രോക്കോളി
ru: романеско
uk: капуста романеско
zh: 宝塔花菜

en: brussels sprouts
af: brusselspruit
ar: كرنب بروكسل
bg: брюкселско зеле
bn: ব্রাসেলস স্প্রাউট
br: kaol-bihan
ca: col de Brusselles
cs: růžičková kapusta, kapusta růžičková
cy: ysgewyll
da: rosenkål
de: Rosenkohl
el: λαχανάκι Βρυξελλών, λάχανα Βρυξελλών
eo: burĝonbrasiko
es: col de Bruselas, coles de bruselas
et: rooskapsas, brüsseli kapsas
eu: bruselaza
fa: کلم بروکسل
fi: ruusukaali, brysselinkaali
fr: chou de Bruxelles, choux de bruxelles
ga: bachlóg Bhruiséile
gd: buinneag Bhruisealach
gl: col de Bruxelas
gv: caaylag
he: כרוב ניצנים
hr: kelj pupčar
hu: bimbós kel
id: kubis brussel
is: rósakál
it: cavolini di Bruxelles, cavolo di Bruxelles
ja: メキャベツ, 芽キャベツ
ka: ბრიუსელის კომბოსტო
kk: Брюссель қырыққабаты
ko: 방울다다기
la: Cauliculus Bruxellanus
lb: brockelchen
lt: briuselio kopūstas
lv: briseles kāposti, rožkāposti
ms: kubis brussels
mt: kaboċċi ta' Brussell, kaboċċi taz-zokk
nb: rosenkål
nl: spruitjes, spruitkool
nn: rosenkål
nv: atʼééké bijish yázhí
pl: kapusta brukselska, Kapusta warzywna brukselska, brukselka, brukselki
pt: couve-de-bruxelas
ro: varză de Bruxelles
ru: брюссельская капуста
sh: prokelj
sk: kapusta obyčajná ružičková, kel ružičkový
sl: brstični ohrovt
sr: прокељ
sv: brysselkål
ta: கிளைக்கோசு
tg: ғужмкарам
th: กะหล่ำดาว
tl: usbong ng bruselas
tr: brüksel lahanası
uk: брюссельська капуста
uz: bryussel karami
vi: cải brussels
zh: 抱子甘藍

en: celtuce, stem lettuce, celery lettuce, Chinese lettuce
la: Lactuca sativa var. angustana

en: gai lan, chinese broccoli, chinese kale, gai-lan, kailan, kai-lan
ca: bròquil xinès
de: kai-lan
eo: ĉina brokolo
es: brassica oleracea var. alboglabra
eu: kai-lan
fa: کلم‌برگ چینی
fi: härmekaali, kiinanbrokkoli, kailaan
fr: brocoli chinois
he: ברוקולי סיני
hr: gai lan
id: kailan
it: brassica oleracea var. alboglabra
ja: カイラン
ko: 가이란
ms: kailan
nl: kailan
sv: daggkål, kinesisk broccoli
th: คะน้า
za: byaekgaiqlanz
zh: 芥藍

en: chinese cabbage
bg: китайско зеле
ca: col xinesa
da: kinakål
de: Chinakohl
el: kινέζικο λάχανο
es: col china
fi: kiinankaali
fr: chou chinois, chou de Chine
ga: cabáiste Síneach
gl: col chinesa, coia chinesa, repolo chinés
hr: kineski kupus
lv: ķīnas kāposti
mk: кинеска зелка
ms: kubis cina
nl: chinese kool
pt: couve-da-china
sk: kapusta čínska
sl: kitajski kapus
sv: kinakål

en: Napa cabbage, kimchi cabbage, wombok
ar: برند
cs: pekingské zelí
eo: pekina brasiko
et: pekingi lehtnaeris
fa: کاهوی چینی
fr: pe-tsaï
id: sawi putih
it: cavolo di pechino
ja: ハクサイ, はくさい
jv: sawi putih
ko: 배추
la: brassica rapa subsp. pekinensis
lt: pekininis kopūstas
nb: napakål
pl: kapusta pekińska, kapusta właściwa pekińska
sk: kapusta pekinská
th: ผักกาดขาว
tl: petsay
tr: çin lahanası
ug: يېسىۋېلەك
uk: капуста пекінська
uz: pekin karami
vi: cải thảo
zh: 大白菜

en: pak choi, bok choy, pok choi
ar: ملفوف صيني
bo: ཚལ་དཀར་ཆེ་བ།
ca: pak choi, bleda xinesa
cs: bok čoj, pak čoj zelí, čínské
da: bok choi, pak choi, kinesisk kål
de: Pak Choi, Chinesischer Senfkohl
el: mποκ τσόι
es: bok choy, pak choi
eu: txinatar aza
fa: کلم چینی
fi: pinaattikiinankaali, pak choi, bok choy, paksoi, pak-soi
fr: bok choy, pak choï
hr: pak choi
hu: bordáskel, bok choy, pak choi, bok choi
id: pakcoy, bok choy
is: blaðkál, salatkál, kínverskt selleríkál
it: bok choy, pak-choi
ja: チンゲンサイ, チンゲン菜, 青梗菜
kn: ಬಾಯ್ ಚಾಯ್
ko: 청경채
la: Brassica rapa subsp. chinensis
mk: бок чој, пак чој
ms: bok choy, pak choi, pok choi
nb: bak choy, pak choy, paksoi, tai tsai
nl: paksoi, bokchoy, pak-choi
pl: pak choi, bok choy, pok choi, kapusta bok choy, kapusta pak choy
pt: pak-choi, bok-choi, tsoi sum
ru: бок-чой, пак-чо́й, кита́йская черешко́вая капу́ста
sv: sellerikål, pak choi
uk: бок-чой
vi: cải thìa, cải bẹ trắng, cải chíp, bạch giới tử